Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.93.040

Loan origination—Third-party loan servicing.

The office may contract with one or more state-based financial institutions regulated by either chapter 31.12 RCW or chapter 30A.04 RCW to provide loan origination and may contract with a third-party entity to provide loan servicing for the program. A third-party entity providing loan servicing shall comply with all of the requirements for student education loan servicers under chapter 31.04 RCW.

[ 2023 c 389 s 5; 2022 c 206 s 5.]